Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1102.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 9073, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 9073. A. The Oklahoma Corporation Commission may
determine upon receiving an application or in any proceeding where
the issue is properly brought before it that extreme purchase costs,
extraordinary costs or both, requested for recovery by a regulated
utility are subject to this act and may be mitigated through
securitization in order to reduce the utility bill impact on
customers. For the purposes set forth in this section, the utility
shall:
Req. No. 12269 Page 1

1. Provide the known extreme purchase and extraordinary costs,
and estimates of any extreme purchase or extraordinary costs not yet
finalized that are being requested for recovery through
securitization;
2. Demonstrate the utility bill impacts of securitization and
the degree of savings customers would experience related to issuing
ratepayer-backed bonds in comparison with traditional utility
financing; and
3. Facilitate a timely audit of all costs requested for
recovery prior to the utility being authorized to recover costs
through the issuance of a financing order. The audit shall be
conducted in compliance with the provisions of Section 15.1a of
Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes and shall be required to adhere to
the definition of "audit" pursuant to paragraph 6 of Section 15.1a
of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes and to adhere to the
requirements of attestation as described in paragraph 5 of Section
15.1a of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
B. The Commission may develop forms and procedures to receive
and review applications for the establishment of qualified costs;
provided, the application shall require but not be limited to the
amount of extreme purchase costs and extraordinary costs requested
for recovery and any other information or documentation required by
the Commission to effectuate this act.

Req. No. 12269 Page 2

C. The Commission shall consider the following factors when
determining whether extreme purchase costs or extraordinary costs
should be mitigated by the issuance of ratepayer-backed bonds:
1. Substantial revenue requirement savings that may be incurred
to the benefit of customers by relying on lower carrying charges
related to ratepayer-backed bonds rather than by conventional
financing obtained by the regulated utility;
2. Customer utility bill impact that may be mitigated by
mandating a longer amortization period for recovery than would
otherwise be practicable or feasible for the regulated utility; and
3. The issuance of ratepayer-backed bonds that may be completed
at a sufficiently low cost such that customer savings are not
exhausted or offset.
D. 1. The Commission may engage financial advisors or other
consultants as may be necessary to assist in the evaluation required
pursuant to subsection C of this section. Expenses incurred for
those purposes shall be recoverable as administrative expenses of
the Oklahoma Development Finance Authority through the issuance of
ratepayer-backed bonds pursuant to Section 8 of this act.
2. The provisions of the Oklahoma Central Purchasing Act,
Section 85.1 et seq. of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes this
title, shall not be applicable to the engagement authorized by
paragraph 1 of this subsection but shall be subject to review by the
Deputy Treasurer for Policy and Debt Management.
Req. No. 12269 Page 3

E. In determining the amount of extreme purchase costs and
extraordinary costs to be mitigated through securitization, the
Commission shall determine that the amounts incurred would otherwise
be recoverable from customers as fair, just and reasonable expenses
and prudently incurred.
F. Extreme purchase costs and extraordinary costs determined by
the Commission to be subject to this act and to be mitigated by
issuing ratepayer-backed bonds shall include carrying costs at an
appropriate rate determined by the Commission as set forth in a
financing order. The carrying costs shall begin accruing at a time
determined by the Commission in the financing order and continue
until the date that ratepayer-backed bonds are issued, or the costs
are otherwise recovered.
G. To the extent the regulated utility receives insurance
proceeds, governmental grants or any other source of funding that
compensates it for extreme purchase costs or extraordinary costs
subject to securitization, or if actual amounts are determined to be
lower than estimated amounts, those amounts shall be used to reduce
the extreme purchase costs or extraordinary costs of the utility
recoverable from customers. The Commission shall direct whether the
funds shall be provided directly to the Authority to offset amounts
securitized or whether they shall be held as a separate regulatory
liability offsetting rate base or returned to customers through some
other appropriate regulatory mechanism. The amounts so received
Req. No. 12269 Page 4

shal l accrue carrying charges at a rate equivalent to the rate
determined pursuant to subsection F of this section if they are
received before ratepayer-backed bonds are issued. If received
after the issuance of ratepayer-backed bonds, the amounts shall
accrue carrying charges at a rate determined by the Commission.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12269 MAH 01/31/25
















Req. No. 12269 Page 5